Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 125, O.S.L.
2024 (3 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 501), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 501. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Oklahoma Aircraft and Rocket Engine Testing Development Grant
Program".
HB2026 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 125, O.S.L.
2024 (3 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 502), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 502. A. There is hereby created, within the Oklahoma
Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics, the Oklahoma Aircraft and
Rocket Engine Testing Development Grant Program to offer financial
assistance by grant to private or public entities for the purpose of
expanding the aircraft and rocket engine testing capabilities of
this state and developing aircraft and rocket engine testing
infrastructure. Grant funding shall be administered based on the
potential for a specific project to enhance the aviation and,
aerospace, and space propulsion industry of this state. A grant
under this program shall be a one-time award.
B. Public, private, and nonprofit entities within this state
that have sufficient financial and management capacity to complete
the requested project are eligible for funding under this program.
Applicants shall provide the following information:
1. Airline or industry support as evidenced by a letter or
other communication directly from the entity stating its support for
the project;
2. The ability to provide a minimum of forty percent (40%)
matching funds for the project; and
3. A proposal summary that shall include any background
information or history with aircraft and rocket engine testing and
HB2026 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

deve lopment, project description, timeline for completion of
project, and estimated budget for the entire project.
C. A grant agreement shall be made between any awardee and the
Department. The grant agreement shall provide for the conditions of
disbursement, shall include a provision requiring the repayment of
awarded funds if the terms are not met, and shall include a
requirement for awardees to provide ongoing quarterly reports
detailing activity related to the project.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 125, O.S.L.
2024 (3 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 503), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 503. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and
Aeronautics to be designated the "Oklahoma Aircraft and Rocket
Engine Testing Development Grant Program Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Department from all
monies received by any public or private donations, contributions,
and gifts received for the benefit of the fund, and any amounts
appropriated by the Legislature, provided for the purpose of funding
grants as provided in this act the Oklahoma Aircraft and Rocket
Engine Testing Development Grant Program. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the Department for the purpose provided for in this
HB2026 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

act the Oklahoma Aircraft and Rocket Engine Testing Development
Grant Program. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/25/2025 – DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.












HB2026 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.